da: Antal guitarpladser: 1 guitar; 2 guitarer; 3 guitarer; Andet
sl-SI: Število mest za kitare: [1 kitara, 1 kitara, 1 kitara, 1 kitara]; 2 kitari; 3 kitare; Drugo
pt-BR: Compartimentos para guitarra número: 1 guitarra; 2 guitarras; 3 guitarras; Outro
es: Cantidad de guitarras: 1 guitarra; 2 guitarras; 3 guitarras; Otro
ro-RO: Numărul de sloturi pentru chitară: 1 chitară; 2 chitare; 3 chitare; Altele
tr: Gitar yuvası sayısı: 1 gitar; 2 gitar; 3 gitar; Diğer
pl: Liczba miejsc na gitary: 1 gitara; 2 gitary; 3 gitary; Inne
fr: Nombre d’emplacements pour guitares: 1 guitare; 2 guitares; 3 guitares; Autre
zh-TW: 吉他容納槽數量: 1 把吉他; 2 把吉他; 3 把吉他; 其他
vi: Số lượng khe cắm đàn guitar: 1 đàn guitar; 2 đàn guitar; 3 đàn guitar; Khác
hr-HR: Broj utora za gitaru: 1 gitara; 2 gitare; 3 gitare; Ostalo
ru: Количество мест для гитар: 1 гитара; 2 гитары; 3 гитары; Другое
fi: Kitarapaikkojen lukumäärä: 1 kitara; 2 kitaraa; 3 kitaraa; Muu
de: Anzahl der Gitarrenfächer: 1 Gitarre; 2 Gitarren; 3 Gitarren; Andere
nb: Antall gitarspor: 1 gitar; 2 gitarer; 3 gitarer; Annet
th: จำนวนช่องสำหรับกีตาร์: กีตาร์ 1 ตัว; กีตาร์ 2 ตัว; กีตาร์ 3 ตัว; อื่นๆ
it: Numero di vani per chitarra: 1 chitarra; 2 chitarre; 3 chitarre; Altro
cs: Počet slotů pro kytary: 1 kytara; 2 kytary; 3 kytary; Ostatní
hu: Gitárhelyek száma: 1 gitár; 2 gitár; 3 gitár; Egyéb
bg-BG: Брой слотове за китара: 1 китара; 2 китари; 3 китари; Друго
sk-SK: Počet pozícií pre gitary: 1 gitara; 2 gitary; 3 gitary; Iné
en: Number of guitar slots: 1 guitar; 2 guitars; 3 guitars; Other
ko: 기타 수납 슬롯 수: 기타 1대; 기타 2대; 기타 3대; 기타
zh-CN: 吉他槽位数量: 1 把吉他; 2 把吉他; 3 把吉他; 其他
pt-PT: Número de vagas para guitarra: 1 guitarra; 2 guitarras; 3 guitarras; Outro
ja: ギターのスロット数: ギター1本; ギター2本; ギター3本; その他
sv: Antal gitarrfack: 1 gitarr; 2 gitarrer; 3 gitarrer; Övrigt
nl: Aantal gitaarsleuven: 1 gitaar; 2 gitaren; 3 gitaren; Overig
el: Αριθμός θέσεων για κιθάρες: 1 κιθάρα; 2 κιθάρες; 3 κιθάρες; Άλλο
lt-LT: Gitarų vietų skaičius: 1 gitara; 2 gitaros; 3 gitaros; Kita